North Dakota, session 69, HB1325.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 20.1-02-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
20.1-02-04. Duties of director.
The director shall:
1. Maintain an office in Bismarck.
2. Adopt rules necessary to the conduct of the department.
3. Keep an accurate record of all the transactions and expenditures of the department
and submit a biennial report to the governor and the secretary of state in accordance
with section 54-06-04.
4. Enforce state laws involving wildlife.
5. Collect and distribute statistics and information germane to this title and publish
information and reports, including a monthly bulletin, for the education of the public in
conservation matters.
6. Examine all waters of the state and, wherever suitable waters are found, arrange to
plant, stock, or deposit available fish, spawn, or fry.
7. Cooperate with the United States fish and wildlife service, or any other appropriate
federal agency, and make applications for fish, spawn, and fry, to apportion and
deposit in waters of the state.
8. Cooperate with and assist clubs and individuals in stocking the waters of this state
with fish.
Page No. 1 25.0884.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
9. Remove or take from any public waters containing a surplus of fish any reasonable
quantity of fish for stocking other public waters, hatching or propagating purposes, or
exchange with other states and countries.
10. Control, construct, mark, designate, manage, and have charge of all state fish
hatcheries, state game farms, game refuges, and game reserves owned, leased, or
controlled for the propagation and protection of game birds, game animals, and fish.
11. Supervise the breeding, propagation, capture, distribution, and preservation of game
birds, game animals, and fish as the director deems advisable.
12. Adopt rules necessary for carrying out section 20.1-10-01 and these rules have the
force of law after one publication in the daily newspapers of this state.
13. Provide the necessary blank forms for making applications for licenses of all kinds and
distribute them among those authorized to sell licenses.
14. Keep a record of all permits issued for the purpose of propagation and domestication
of game birds or protected animals.
15. Keep a record of and make available to the public all positive detections of chronic
wasting disease for four years, including a microscopic slide of the prion and necropsy
report.
Page No. 2 25.0884.01000